Louisiana, session 2026, HB809.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 39:13(B) and (C) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§13. Comprehensive state lands inventory; nonproductive property; annual
reporting; sale at public auction
* * *
B. Annually, on or before March first, the commissioner of administration
shall submit an inventory report to the natural resources committees of the House of
Representatives and the Senate Louisiana Housing Corporation and to the Senate
Finance Committee and the House Committee on Appropriations Committee of the
House of Representatives. The inventory shall include an identification by the
division of administration of any land or buildings that are determined to be
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-777 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 809
nonproductive, according to criteria developed by the division of administration and
approved by the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget.
C. The commissioner of administration shall, on or before March first of
each year, submit any recommendations to the Joint Legislative Committee on the
Budget detailing the nonproductive property that he believes should be sold at public
auction. Upon the approval of the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget, the
commissioner of administration may sell property deemed nonproductive if the
property is not earmarked by the Louisiana Housing Corporation for administration
pursuant to R.S. 40:600.112.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 40:600.112 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§600.112. Development of low-income housing; surplus state property
A. The following terms shall have the following meanings unless the context
clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Affordable housing" shall mean residential property that is housing for
rent or purchase by very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income residents.
(2) "Affordable housing entity" means a corporation or governmental entity
whose mission is to create or rehabilitate housing for unhoused and very-low to
moderate-income households, individuals, seniors, or people with disabilities.
(3) "Deeply affordable housing" means a residential unit that is set aside for
a very low-income resident and the rent price for that unit shall not exceed thirty
percent of the resident's income.
(4) "Low-income resident" means a resident whose income does not exceed
eighty percent of the most recent Median Family Income estimate for the state
established by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.
(5) "Moderate-income resident" means a resident whose income does not
exceed one hundred percent of the most recent Median Family Income estimate for
the state established by the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development.
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-777 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 809
(6) "Permanent supportive housing" means affordable housing offering
supportive services that assist people who have experienced chronic homelessness.
(7) "Surplus immovable property" means immovable property that has been
identified by the division of administration as nonproductive in accordance with the
provisions of R.S. 41:140 and earmarked by the Louisiana Housing Corporation for
administration pursuant to the provisions of this Section.
(8) "Very low-income resident" means a resident whose income does not
exceed fifty percent of the most recent Median Family Income estimate for the state
established by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.
B.(1) The Louisiana Housing Corporation shall maintain an inventory of
surplus immovable property and shall post a list of the inventory on its publicly
available website. The list shall be updated by the Louisiana Housing Corporation
at least annually.
(2) Prior to its transfer or lease pursuant to the provisions of this Section, the
governor or his designee may determine that one or more items of surplus
immovable property are still required for use by the state. The governor or his
designee shall issue his reasons for withholding the property in a letter which shall
be made publicly available on the Louisiana Housing Corporation's website.
C.(1) In accordance with rules promulgated by the Louisiana Housing
Corporation, affordable housing entities may submit proposals for the development
of affordable housing on one or more items of surplus immovable property on the
inventory list. Proposals for development of property pursuant to the provisions of
this Section shall be evaluated for award at least once a year, if property is available.
(2) The board of directors of the Louisiana Housing Corporation shall make
its determination regarding award of property pursuant to the provisions of this
Section based on the scores of submitted proposals. The applications shall be
evaluated on a point system. Points shall be assigned for each of the following:
(a) Whether the project will include permanent supportive housing units.
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-777 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 809
(b) The proportion of deeply affordable housing units a project will supply
versus other applicant projects for the same surplus immovable property.
(c) Non-profit, community land trust, or limited equity cooperative
ownership.
(d) The provision of voluntary, on-site supportive services for persons with
disabilities.
(e) Acceptance of tenant-based vouchers.
D. Upon selection of an affordable housing entity to develop a parcel of
surplus immovable property, the Louisiana Housing Corporation shall:
(1) Enter into a cooperative endeavor agreement with the affordable housing
entity in accordance with Article VII, Section 14(C) of the Constitution of Louisiana.
In exchange for rights in the parcel, the affordable housing entity may provide
development services, including procurement of construction materials, that at a
minimum are equal to the value of the surplus immovable property.
(2) The Louisiana Housing Corporation shall notify the commissioner of
administration of the award to the affordable housing entity, including the total
number of properties conveyed, the number of affordable housing units proposed to
be produced, and the nature of the development approved. The commissioner shall
oversee the transfer of property rights in the surplus immovable property by deed or
lease to the affordable housing entity.
E. The Louisiana Housing Corporation shall report annually to the
legislature, the governor, and the commissioner of administration no later than
forty-five days prior to each regular session of the legislature the following
information:
(1) The total number of properties conveyed,
(2) The number of affordable housing units proposed to be produced and the
number completed.
(3) Inventory of developments approved by the Louisiana Housing
Corporation, including the nature of each development.
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-777 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 809
(4) Inventory of parcels of surplus state immovable property transferred to
an affordable housing entity.
Section 3. R.S. 41:140(B), (C), and (F) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§140. Sales of immovable property by state agencies
* * *
B. For any immovable property designated to be nonessential, the division
shall prepare a land management evaluation report setting forth recommendations
for the best use or disposition of the property. A copy of this report shall be filed
with the House Committee on Natural Resources and Environment and Senate
Committee on Natural Resources and delivered to the member of the House and
Senate in whose district the immovable property is located Louisiana Housing
Corporation.
C. Unless approval is received from the House Committee on Natural
Resources and Environment and Senate Committee on Natural Resources within
ninety days after receiving notice, the division shall not initiate implementation of
its recommendation for best use or disposition of the property. The Louisiana
Housing Corporation shall determine within ninety days of receipt of the report
submitted pursuant to Subsection B of this Section whether to administer the
nonessential property in accordance with R.S. 40:600.112. If the Louisiana Housing
Corporation does not select the nonessential property, the division shall initiate
implementation of its recommendation for best use or disposition of the property
after receipt of approval from the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget.
* * *
F. The division shall submit an annual report to the House Committee on
Natural Resources and Environment and Senate Committee on Natural Resources
legislature and the governor, detailing the amount of property it sold pursuant to the
provisions of this Section, the agencies from which such property came, the cost of
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-777 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 809
the sale, the net proceeds from such sale, and an updated inventory of immovable
property still belonging to the state and which agency possesses the property.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026; if vetoed by the governor
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on July 1,
2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.